src-fst-morphology-affixes-numerals.lexc.md
Numeral affix file

* **LEXICON ARABICCASES**  adds +Arab

* **LEXICON ARABICCASE**  adds +Arab

* **LEXICON ARABICCASE0**  adds +Arab

!! __LEXICON NUM-PREFIXES__

* __LEXICON REALARABICfirst__ to avoid 0 as first arabic, except from only 0, or in front of comma

* __LEXICON REALARABICpunct__ to get number after

* __LEXICON REALARABIC__ 1-4 arabics

* __LEXICON REALARABICfirstpart__ numbers like 199 878, 199.878, 199,878, 12000-13000

* __LEXICON REALDECARABICsecond__ 19912,878 and 12000-13000

* __LEXICON REALDECARABICdec__ hyph and comma

* __LEXICON REALARABICsecondpart__ numbers like 199 878 and 199.878
allow 199,878 as special typo

* __LEXICON REALARABICsecondpart_cont__ loop, to case suffix, to , or -,

* __LEXICON REALARABICDECIM__ loop and to % and case suffix

* __LEXICON ARABIC__ +Sem/ID, +Ord

* __LEXICON ARABICLOOPS__

* __LEXICON ARABICSabcdef__

* __LEXICON ARABICDATE__

* __LEXICON ARABICDATEHYPH__

* __LEXICON ARABICDATENUM__

* __LEXICON ARABICDATENUM2__

* __LEXICON datetag_w_dot_cont__

* __LEXICON ARABICCLOCK__ is a regex for clock time.

* __LEXICON CLOCK-sep__ different separators for intervals, or one clock time only

* __LEXICON ARABICCLOCK2__ is the second component of intervals, idntical to ARABICCLOCK

* __LEXICON ARABICCLOCK2x__ is the second component of intervals,

* __LEXICON ARABICCLOCKDECIMALS__ is fractional seconds

* __LEXICON ARABICYEAR__

* __LEXICON numyear__

* __LEXICON moreyear__

* __LEXICON moreyearx__

* __LEXICON yeartagplx__

* __LEXICON ARABICORD__

* __LEXICON REALARABICDELIMITER__

* __LEXICON ARABICLOOP__

* __LEXICON MARKDOT__

* __LEXICON ROMAN__  roman numerals

* __LEXICON ROM-SINGEL__

* __LEXICON ROM-THOUSAND__

* __LEXICON ROM-THOUSAND-TAG__

* __LEXICON ROM-HUNDRED__

* __LEXICON ROM-HUNDRED-TAG__

* __LEXICON ROM-TEN__

* __LEXICON ROM-TEN-TAG__

* __LEXICON ROM-ONE__

* __LEXICON ROM-ONE-TAG__

* __LEXICON ROM-SPLIT__

* __LEXICON 2ROMAN__

* __LEXICON 2ROM-THOUSAND__

* __LEXICON 2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG__

* __LEXICON 2ROM-HUNDRED__

* __LEXICON 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG__

* __LEXICON 2ROM-TEN__

* __LEXICON 2ROM-TEN-TAG__

* __LEXICON 2ROM-ONE__

* __LEXICON 2ROM-ONE-TAG__

* __LEXICON ISOLATED-NUMEXP__ some isolated numeral expressions

* __LEXICON ARABICLOOPORD__ ordinals

* __LEXICON ACASETAG__  is for 1e+Num+Sg+Num:1e

* __LEXICON ARABICDELIMITER__  blank + 3 delim, what does the lg counc prefer?

* __LEXICON ARABICDELIMITERORD__ ordinals

* __LEXICON PROSENT__ % and case suffix

* __LEXICON POSTPROSENT__ % and case suffix

* __LEXICON ROMNUMTAG__

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/numerals.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-tkl/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/numerals.lexc)</small>
